District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-301.08

Acquisition of property from prospective lessee or purchaser.

Repealed.

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 797, ch. 736, § 9
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 232(e), 50 DCR 5668

History

1981 Ed., § 5-808.
1973 Ed., § 5-708.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).

Emergency Legislation